Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$36,313,435 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Department
of Energy.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$3,023,630 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the State Department of  Energy for debt service for the energy
efficiency and sustainable technology loan program, and  for the Public Schools Grant Pro-
gram.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,484,648 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected  or received by the State Department of
Energy.
SECTION 4. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the following expenditures by the
State Department of Energy are not limited:
(1) Expenditures for loans for small scale local energy projects; and
(2) Expenditures for debt service.
SECTION 5.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5009 (HB 5009-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5009 (HB 5009-A) Page 2